src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON BASSALASSTETStem
   BASSALASSTETINCH ;

LEXICON HIEJTEDAHTTETStem
   DAHTTEINCH ;

LEXICON RAVGGALASSTETStem
   RAVGGALASSTETINCH ;

LEXICON GÁDJOTStem
   GÁDJOTINCH ;
! EVEN-PASSIVE ;

LEXICON BÅRSSJOTStem
   BÅRSSJOTINCH ;
! EVEN-PASSIVE ;

LEXICON BASSATINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN           ;
                              INFL-EVEN           ;
                              DeverbalNounsBASSAT ;

LEXICON RAVGGATINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN            ;
                              INFL-EVEN            ;
                              DeverbalNounsRAVGGAT ;

LEXICON ASSTATINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN           ;
                              INFL-EVEN           ;
                              DeverbalNounsASSTAT ;

LEXICON VIEDJETINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN            ;
                              INFL-VIEDJETEVEN     ;
                              DeverbalNounsRAVGGAT ;

LEXICON JIEHKETINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN           ;
                              INFL-VIEDJETEVEN    ;
                              DeverbalNounsBASSAT ;

LEXICON BASSALASSTETINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN                  ;
                              INFL-EVEN                 ;
                              DeverbalNounsBASSALASSTET ;

LEXICON DAHTTEINCH ! Almost same as BASSALASSTETINCH, but Special lexicon for -DAHTTE because if NomAG bargadahttijn is common typo of bargadattijn. Som this path leads to lexicon where "bargadahttijn" is not generated and not in speller
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN           ;
                             INFL-EVEN           ;
                             DeverbalNounsDAHTTE ;

LEXICON RAVGGALASSTETINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN                   ;
                              INFL-EVEN                  ;
                              DeverbalNounsRAVGGALASSTET ;

LEXICON GÁDJOTINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN           ;
                              INFL-o-             ;
                              DeverbalNounsBASSAT ;

LEXICON BÅRSSJOTINCH
 +Der3+Der/InchL+V:»goahte%> INFL-EVEN            ;
                              INFL-o-              ;
                              DeverbalNounsRAVGGAT ;


LEXICON BIEGGATinfl
                        +Ind+Prs+Sg3:Y2         K      ;
                        +Ind+Prt+Sg3:Q1j        K      ;
                         +Ind+ConNeg:Q1         K      ;
                            +Pot+Sg3:Q1sj       K      ;
                         +Pot+ConNeg:Q1tja      K      ;
                          +Imprt+Sg3:Y1is       ENDLEX ;
                        +ImprtII+Sg3:Y1us       ENDLEX ;
                             +PrfPrc:Y3m        K      ;
                                +Inf:t          K      ;
                                +Ger:Q1dijn     K      ;
                                +Sup:Q2tjit     K      ;
                             +VAbess:Q1k        K      ;
!                            +VAbess:Q1dak      K      ;
                             +VAbess:Q1k        VUOHTA ;
!                            +VAbess:Q1dak      VUOHTA ;
                               +VGen:Q1         K      ;
                       +Imprt+ConNeg:Q1         ENDLEX ;
               +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Inf:»goahte%>t K      ;
       +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:»goahtá%>  K      ;
       +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:»gådi%>j   K      ;
                          +Actio+Nom:m          K      ;
                          +Actio+Gen:ma         K      ;
                          +Actio+Com:mijn       K      ;
                          +Actio+Ess:min        K      ;
                          +Actio+Ela:mis        K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»m         K      ;
        +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»m         R      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»mav       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»ma        K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»mij       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ine:»min       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ela:»mis       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»mijn      K      ;
  +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»mijna     K      ; !
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ess:»min       K      ;


LEXICON GALSSJOTinfl
                        +Ind+Prs+Sg3:Y2         K      ;
                        +Ind+Prt+Sg3:Q1j        K      ;
                         +Ind+ConNeg:Q1         K      ;
                            +Pot+Sg3:Q1sj       K      ;
                         +Pot+ConNeg:Q1tja      K      ;
                          +Imprt+Sg3:Y1s        ENDLEX ;
                        +ImprtII+Sg3:Y1s        ENDLEX ;
                             +PrfPrc:Y3m        K      ;
                                +Inf:t          K      ;
                                +Ger:Q1dijn     K      ;
                                +Sup:Q1tjit     K      ;
                                +Sup:X7tjit     K      ;
                             +VAbess:Q1k        K      ;
!                            +VAbess:Q1dak      K      ; !Inga is a littlebit unsure about the -dak ending, maybe itºs really an ending for odd-syll but is mixed up?
                             +VAbess:Q1k        VUOHTA ;
!                            +VAbess:Q1dak      VUOHTA ;
                               +VGen:Q1         K      ;
                       +Imprt+ConNeg:Q1         ENDLEX ;
               +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Inf:»goahte%>t K      ;
       +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:»goahtá%>  K      ;
       +Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:»gådi%>j   K      ;
                          +Actio+Nom:m          K      ;
                          +Actio+Gen:ma         K      ;
                          +Actio+Com:mijn       K      ;
                          +Actio+Ess:min        K      ;
                          +Actio+Ela:mis        K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»m         K      ;
        +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»m         R      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»mav       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»ma        K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»mij       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ine:»min       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ela:»mis       K      ;
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»mijn      K      ;
  +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»mijna     K      ; !
           +Der3+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ess:»min       K      ;

!!
!!
!!
!!
!! ## Odd-syllable stems
! ------------------
!!
!!

!LEXICON ITINC
!   UNNEDIT_TV ;
!! This is just awaiting a manual classification
! of incoming verbs from the smesmj dictionary project.

LEXICON BIEKKASTIT_IV !!= @CODE@ Impersonals, only Sg3
 +IV:   DeverbalVerbsBIEKKASTIT ;
 +IV:%> BIEKKASTITinfl          ;
 +IV:   SG3PASS                 ;
