src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
asjkastit+V:asjkast BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
balvadit+V:balvad9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
barjjedit+V:barjjed9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
biekkadit+V:biekkad9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
biekkastit+V:biekkast BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
bievlladit+V:bievllad9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
biváldit+V:biváld9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
boavddistit+V:boavddist BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
bålåstit+V:bålåst BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
denjadit+V:denjad9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
dálkkuhit+V:dálkkuh9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
galsjedit+V:galsjed9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
gemudit+V:gemud9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
germudit+V:germud9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
goasodit+V:goasod9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
guolmudit+V:guolmud9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
guovsudit+V:guovsud9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
gálodit+V:gálod9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
gálostit+V:gálost BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
hablledit+V:hablled9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
harvatjit+V:harvatj BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
harvvelit+V:harvvel BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
harváskit+V:harvásk BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
hiblledit+V:hiblled9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
lievhnodit+V:lievhnod9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
lievnodit+V:lievnod9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
loattjedit+V:loattjed9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
láhodit+V:láhod9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
muohtestit+V:muohtest BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
murkkodit+V:murkkod9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
murkudit+V:murkud9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
májeldit+V:májeld9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
navoldit+V:navold9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
nirvudit+V:nirvud9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
njátsodit+V:njátsod9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
ruvojdit+V:ruvojd9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
rássjodit+V:rássjod9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
siebladit+V:sieblad9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
sierridit+V:sierrid9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
sjierristit+V:sjierrist BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
sjoavodit+V:sjoavod9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
slabttsedit+V:slabttsed9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
snirvudit+V:snirvud9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
suvoldit+V:suvold9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
tjavtjajdit+V:tjavtjajd9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
tjirástit+V:tjirást BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
tjoaskedit+V:tjoasked9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
tjuormastit+V:tjuormast BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
tjuovgedit+V:tjuovged9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
tjåskijdit+V:tjåskijd9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
vahtsadit+V:vahtsad9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
vatjojdit+V:vatjojd9 BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
viertostit+V:viertost BIEKKASTIT_IV ;
